Alabama, session 2026rs, HB645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) There is levied in the state a privilege
tax of eight percent of the net gambling revenue collected
from pari-mutuel wagering on historical horse racing on
computerized machines of each historical horse racing
licensee. The tax shall be collected by the Department of
Revenue from each historical horse racing licensee and
distributed as provided by local law.
Page 1

distributed as provided by local law.
HB645 INTRODUCED
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), "net gambling
revenue" means the total amount of money or value in any form
received as a result of any pari-mutuel wagering on historical
horse racing activities, excluding free bets, free lays, and
promotional credits, less federal excise taxes, voided wagers,
and the total money or value in any form paid as prizes or
winnings.
(c) The state privilege tax collected under this
section is exclusive of and supersedes any other local taxes,
fees, or commissions now imposed on historical horse racing
pari-mutuel activities in the state.
(d) Nothing in this section shall change the existing
tax structure for live greyhound racing, simulcast live
greyhound racing, or live or simulcast horse racing which is
not historical horse racing.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize, permit, or expand any form of gambling activity
beyond that which is permitted by law on the effective date of
this act.
Section 2. The following sections are repealed:
(1) Section 11-65-29, Code of Alabama 1975, imposing
the state horse wagering fee in Class 1 municipalities.
(2) Section 11-65-30, Code of Alabama 1975, imposing
the commission wagering fee in Class 1 municipalities.
(3) Section 11-65-35, Code of Alabama 1975, relating to
certain racing taxes in Class 1 municipalities.
(4) Section 45-44-150.12, Code of Alabama 1975,
imposing a tax due on pari-mutuel pools in Macon County,
Page 2

imposing a tax due on pari-mutuel pools in Macon County,
HB645 INTRODUCED
Alabama.
(5) Section 45-32-150.13, Code of Alabama 1975,
imposing a tax on pari-mutuel pools in Greene County, Alabama.
(6) Section 45-49-151.14, Code of Alabama 1975,
imposing a tax on pari-mutuel pools in Mobile County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3